en: Gold medal of the German Agricultural Society
ca: Medalla d'Or de la Societat Agrícola Alemanya
cs: Zlatá medaile Německé Zemědělské Společnosti / DLG
de: DLG Goldener Preis
es: Medalla de oro de la sociedad Alemana de agricultura
fi: Saksan maatalousyhdistyksen kultamitali
fr: Médaille d'or de la Société Allemande d'Agriculture
hr: Zlatna medalja Njemačkog poljoprivrednog društva
it: Medaglia d'oro della Società Agricola Tedesca
pt: Medalha de ouro da Sociedade Agrícola Alemã

en: 2009 Bronze medal of the German Agricultural Society
de: DLG Bronzener Preis 2009
fi: Saksan maatalousyhdistyksen pronssimitali 2009
fr: Médaille de bronze 2009 de la Société Allemande d'Agriculture
hr: Brončana medalja Njemačkog poljoprivrednog društva 2009
pt: Medalha de bronze da Sociedade Agrícola Alemã de 2009

en: 2010 Bronze medal of the German Agricultural Society
de: DLG Bronzener Preis 2010
fi: Saksan maatalousyhdistyksen pronssimitali 2010
fr: Médaille de bronze 2010 de la Société Allemande d'Agriculture
hr: Brončana medalja Njemačkog poljoprivrednog društva 2010
pt: Medalha de bronze da Sociedade Agrícola Alemã de 2010

en: 2011 Bronze medal of the German Agricultural Society
de: DLG Bronzener Preis 2011
fi: Saksan maatalousyhdistyksen pronssimitali 2011
fr: Médaille de bronze 2011 de la Société Allemande d'Agriculture
hr: Brončana medalja Njemačkog poljoprivrednog društva 2011
pt: Medalha de bronze da Sociedade Agrícola Alemã de 2011

en: 2012 Bronze medal of the German Agricultural Society
de: DLG Bronzener Preis 2012
fi: Saksan maatalousyhdistyksen pronssimitali 2012
fr: Médaille de bronze 2012 de la Société Allemande d'Agriculture
hr: Brončana medalja Njemačkog poljoprivrednog društva 2012
pt: Medalha de bronze da Sociedade Agrícola Alemã de 2012

en: 2013 Bronze medal of the German Agricultural Society
de: DLG Bronzener Preis 2013
fi: Saksan maatalousyhdistyksen pronssimitali 2013
fr: Médaille de bronze 2013 de la Société Allemande d'Agriculture
hr: Brončana medalja Njemačkog poljoprivrednog društva 2013
pt: Medalha de bronze da Sociedade Agrícola Alemã de 2013

en: 2014 Bronze medal of the German Agricultural Society
ca: Medalla de bronze de la Societat Agrícola Alemanya el 2014
de: DLG Bronzener Preis 2014
fi: Saksan maatalousyhdistyksen pronssimitali 2014
fr: Médaille de bronze 2014 de la Société Allemande d'Agriculture
hr: Brončana medalja Njemačkog poljoprivrednog društva 2014
pt: Medalha de bronze da Sociedade Agrícola Alemã de 2014

en: 2015 Bronze medal of the German Agricultural Society
ca: Medalla de bronze de la Societat Agrícola Alemanya el 2015
de: DLG Bronzener Preis 2015
fi: Saksan maatalousyhdistyksen pronssimitali 2015
fr: Médaille de bronze 2015 de la Société Allemande d'Agriculture
hr: Brončana medalja Njemačkog poljoprivrednog društva 2015
pt: Medalha de bronze da Sociedade Agrícola Alemã de 2015

en: 2016 Bronze medal of the German Agricultural Society
de: DLG Bronzener Preis 2016
fi: Saksan maatalousyhdistyksen pronssimitali 2016
fr: Médaille de bronze 2016 de la Société Allemande d'Agriculture
hr: Brončana medalja Njemačkog poljoprivrednog društva 2016
pt: Medalha de bronze da Sociedade Agrícola Alemã de 2016

en: 2017 Bronze medal of the German Agricultural Society
de: DLG Bronzener Preis 2017
fi: Saksan maatalousyhdistyksen pronssimitali 2017
fr: Médaille de bronze 2017 de la Société Allemande d'Agriculture
hr: Brončana medalja Njemačkog poljoprivrednog društva 2017
it: Medaglia di bronzo 2017 della Società Agricola Tedesca
pt: Medalha de bronze da Sociedade Agrícola Alemã de 2017

en: 2018 Bronze medal of the German Agricultural Society
de: DLG Bronzener Preis 2018
fi: Saksan maatalousyhdistyksen pronssimitali 2018
fr: Médaille de bronze 2018 de la Société Allemande d'Agriculture
hr: Brončana medalja Njemačkog poljoprivrednog društva 2018
pt: Medalha de bronze da Sociedade Agrícola Alemã de 2018

en: 2019 Bronze medal of the German Agricultural Society
de: DLG Bronzener Preis 2019
fi: Saksan maatalousyhdistyksen pronssimitali 2019
fr: Médaille de bronze 2019 de la Société Allemande d'Agriculture
hr: Brončana medalja Njemačkog poljoprivrednog društva 2019
pt: Medalha de bronze da Sociedade Agrícola Alemã de 2019

en: 2020 Bronze medal of the German Agricultural Society
de: DLG Bronzener Preis 2020
fi: Saksan maatalousyhdistyksen pronssimitali 2020
fr: Médaille de bronze 2020 de la Société Allemande d'Agriculture
hr: Brončana medalja Njemačkog poljoprivrednog društva 2020
pt: Medalha de bronze da Sociedade Agrícola Alemã de 2020

en: 2021 Bronze medal of the German Agricultural Society
de: DLG Bronzener Preis 2021
fi: Saksan maatalousyhdistyksen pronssimitali 2021
fr: Médaille de bronze 2021 de la Société Allemande d'Agriculture
hr: Brončana medalja Njemačkog poljoprivrednog društva 2021
pt: Medalha de bronze da Sociedade Agrícola Alemã de 2021

en: 2022 Bronze medal of the German Agricultural Society
de: DLG Bronzener Preis 2022
fi: Saksan maatalousyhdistyksen pronssimitali 2022
fr: Médaille de bronze 2022 de la Société Allemande d'Agriculture
hr: Brončana medalja Njemačkog poljoprivrednog društva 2022
pt: Medalha de bronze da Sociedade Agrícola Alemã de 2022

en: 2023 Bronze medal of the German Agricultural Society
de: DLG Bronzener Preis 2023
fi: Saksan maatalousyhdistyksen pronssimitali 2023
fr: Médaille de bronze 2023 de la Société Allemande d'Agriculture
hr: Brončana medalja Njemačkog poljoprivrednog društva 2023
pt: Medalha de bronze da Sociedade Agrícola Alemã de 2023

en: 2024 Bronze medal of the German Agricultural Society
de: DLG Bronzener Preis 2024

en: 2025 Bronze medal of the German Agricultural Society
de: DLG Bronzener Preis 2025

en: 2009 Silver medal of the German Agricultural Society
de: DLG Silberner Preis 2009
fi: Saksan maatalousyhdistyksen hopeamitali 2009
fr: Médaille d'argent 2009 de la Société Allemande d'Agriculture
hr: Srebrna medalja Njemačkog poljoprivrednog društva 2009
pt: Medalha de prata da Sociedade Agrícola Alemã de 2009

en: 2010 Silver medal of the German Agricultural Society
de: DLG Silberner Preis 2010
fi: Saksan maatalousyhdistyksen hopeamitali 2010
fr: Médaille d'argent 2010 de la Société Allemande d'Agriculture
hr: Srebrna medalja Njemačkog poljoprivrednog društva 2010
pt: Medalha de prata da Sociedade Agrícola Alemã de 2010